apertium-eng-kaz1/apertium-eng-kaz.eng.dix
    <pardef n="prov/e__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>es</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ed</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ed</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>en</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="th/ink__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ink</l>
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ink</l>
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>inks</l>
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ought</l>
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ought</l>
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>inking</l>
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>inking</l>
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>inking</l>
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="wr/ite__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ite</l>
        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ite</l>
        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ites</l>
        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ote</l>
        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>itten</l>
        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iting</l>
        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iting</l>
        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iting</l>
        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="r/ing__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ings</l>
        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ang</l>
        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ung</l>
        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>inging</l>
        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>inging</l>
        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>inging</l>
        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="s/eek__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eek</l>
        <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eek</l>
        <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eeks</l>
        <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ought</l>
        <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ought</l>
        <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eeking</l>
        <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eeking</l>
        <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eeking</l>
        <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sh/ear__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ear</l>
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ear</l>
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ears</l>
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eared</l>
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eared</l>
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>orn</l>
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>earing</l>
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>earing</l>
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>earing</l>
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

                            <e lm="think" i=""><i>th</i><par n="th/ink__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="think so" i=""><i>th</i><par n="th/ink__vblex"/><p><l><b/>so</l><r><g><b/>so</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="think that" i=""><i>th</i><par n="th/ink__vblex"/><p><l><b/>that</l><r><g><b/>that</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="write" i=""><i>wr</i><par n="wr/ite__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="write about" i=""><i>wr</i><par n="wr/ite__vblex"/><p><l><b/>about</l><r><j/>about<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="seek protection" i=""><i>s</i><par n="s/eek__vblex"/><p><l><b/>protection</l><r><g><b/>protection</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="prove" i=""><i>prov</i><par n="prov/e__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="sing" i=""><i>s</i><par n="r/ing__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="seek" i=""><i>s</i><par n="s/eek__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="sling" i=""><i>sl</i><par n="r/ing__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="spring" i=""><i>spr</i><par n="r/ing__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="think" i=""><i>th</i><par n="th/ink__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="think so" i=""><i>th</i><par n="th/ink__vblex"/><p><l><b/>so</l><r><g><b/>so</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="think that" i=""><i>th</i><par n="th/ink__vblex"/><p><l><b/>that</l><r><g><b/>that</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="write" i=""><i>wr</i><par n="wr/ite__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="write about" i=""><i>wr</i><par n="wr/ite__vblex"/><p><l><b/>about</l><r><j/>about<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="rewrite" i=""><i>rewr</i><par n="wr/ite__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="sling" i=""><i>sl</i><par n="r/ing__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="smite" i=""><i>sm</i><par n="wr/ite__vblex"/></e>
